South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S869.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-780(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Permanent license plates must be issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles for all motor vehicles operated by the State, or its political subdivisions, or tribal governments located in the State. The license fee, including registration, is two dollars. Permanent plates must bear the words "South Carolina", the number, and a prefix "SG", "RG", "CG", or "MG", or "TG" to designate respectively state government, regional government, county government, or municipal government, or tribal government. The department may issue a permanent license plate to vehicles used by state or local law enforcement agencies. The fee for the permanent plate is two dollars. A decal may be issued to designate the law enforcement agency. The department may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of the decal. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----